hu: Könyvjelző alakja: Állatos; Szögletes; Kerek; Négyszögletes; Egyéb
it: Forma del segnalibro: Animale; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Quadrata; Altro
da: Bogmærkeform: Dyr; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkant; Andet
pt-BR: Forma do marcador: Animal; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
th: รูปร่างบุ๊กมาร์ก: สัตว์; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
vi: Hình dạng dấu trang: Động vật; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày tròn; Mũi giày vuông; Khác
es: Forma de marcalibros: Animal; Rectangular; Redondo; Cuadrado; Otros
fi: Kirjanmerkin muoto: Eläin; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Neliömäinen; Muu
lt-LT: Skirtuko forma: Gyvūnas; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Kvadratinis; Kita
sl-SI: Oblika bralnega zaznamka: Žival; Pravokotno; Okrogla; Kvadraten; Drugo
ro-RO: Formă semn de carte: Animal; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; Pătrat; Altele
ja: しおりの形: 動物; 長方形; ラウンド; スクエア; その他
el: Σχήμα σελιδοδείκτη: Ζώο; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
pl: Kształt zakładki: Zwierzęcy; Prostokątna; Runda; Kwadrat; Inne
zh-CN: 书签形状: 动物; 矩形; 圆头; 方形; 其他
zh-TW: 書籤形狀: 動物; 長方形; 圓頭; 方頭; 其他
cs: Tvar záložky: Zvíře; Obdélníkový; Oválná; Čtvercová; Jiné
tr: Kitap ayracı şekli: Hayvan; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Kare; Diğer
en: Bookmark shape: Animal; Rectangular; Round; Square; Other
ru: Форма закладки: Животное; Прямоугольник; Круг; Квадрат; Другое
bg-BG: Форма на отметка: Животно; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Квадратна; Други
ko: 북마크 모양: 동물; 직사각형; 라운드; 스퀘어; 기타
pt-PT: Formato do marcador: Animal; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
nb: Bokmerkeform: Dyr; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkantet; Annet
sk-SK: Tvar záložky: Zviera; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Štvorcový; Iné
hr-HR: Oblik označivača stranica: Životinja; Pravokutnik; Krug; Kvadrat; Ostalo
de: Form des Lesezeichens: Tier; Rechteckig; Rund; Quadrat; Sonstiges
nl: Vorm bladwijzer: Dier; Rechthoekig; Rond; Vierkant; Andere
fr: Forme du signet: Animal; Rectangulaire; Rond; Carré; Autre
sv: Bokmärkesform: Djur; Rektangulär; Rund; Fyrkantig; Övrigt